Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.122

Private-commercial pesticide applicator license—Requirements.

It is unlawful for any person to act as a private-commercial pesticide applicator without having obtained a private-commercial pesticide applicator license from the director. Application for a private-commercial pesticide applicator license must be accompanied by a fee of thirty-eight dollars.

[ 2021 c 244 s 10; 2008 c 285 s 23; 1997 c 242 s 13; 1994 c 283 s 11; 1993 sp.s. c 19 s 6; 1992 c 170 s 6; 1991 c 109 s 32; 1989 c 380 s 41; 1979 c 92 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.